src/orthography/inituppercase.regex
a (->) A, à (->) À, á (->) Á, ä (->) Ä, æ (->) Æ, b (->) B, c (->) C, ç (->) Ç, 
d (->) D, e (->) E, é (->) É, è (->) È, ê (->) Ê, f (->) F, g (->) G, h (->) H,
i (->) I, í (->) Í, ï (->) Ï, î (->) Î, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M,
n (->) N, o (->) O, ô (->) Ô, ó (->) Ó, œ (->) Œ, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R,
s (->) S, t (->) T, u (->) U, ü (->) Ü, ù (->) Ù, ú (->) Ú, v (->) V, w (->) W,
x (->) X, y (->) Y, z (->) Z || .#. _ ;
